Hawaii statutes.
§286-26.5 Special interest vehicles.
(a) As used in this section:

"Collector" means an owner of one or
more vehicles, including parts vehicles, who collects, purchases, acquires,
trades, or disposes of a vehicle or its parts, for the owner's own use, to
preserve, restore, and maintain the vehicle or another vehicle for hobby or
historical purposes.

"Parts vehicle" means a vehicle that
is owned by a collector to furnish parts for the restoration or maintenance of
a special interest vehicle.

"Street rod replica vehicle" means a
vehicle that was assembled from a manufactured kit, either as:

(1) A complete kit to construct a new vehicle
consisting of a prefabricated body and chassis;

(2) Components manufactured before 1968; or

(3) Components manufactured after 1967 to resemble a
vehicle manufactured before 1968;

and that has been modified in its body style or
design through the use of nonoriginal or reproduction components, such as the
frame, engine, drive train, suspension, or brakes, in a manner that does not
adversely affect its safe performance as a motor vehicle or render the vehicle
unlawful for use on public highways.

"Street rod vehicle" means a vehicle
that was:

(1) Manufactured before 1968; or

(2) Manufactured after 1967 to resemble a vehicle
manufactured before 1968;

and that has been modified in its body style or
design through the use of nonoriginal or reproduction components, such as the
frame, engine, drive train, suspension, or brakes, in a manner that does not
adversely affect its safe performance as a motor vehicle or render the vehicle
unlawful for use on public highways. The term does not include a motorcycle,
an antique vehicle, or a restored vehicle.

(b) If a street rod vehicle was manufactured
before 1968 and has been modified in body style or design, the make and year of
the vehicle shall be the year the vehicle most nearly resembles. If a street
rod vehicle was manufactured after 1967 to resemble a vehicle manufactured
before 1968, the body type of the vehicle shall be street rod vehicle or
"STRD".

(c) A state vehicle identification number
shall be issued to a street rod vehicle that was manufactured after 1967 to
resemble a vehicle manufactured before 1968, when no vehicle identification
number is present on the vehicle; when more than one vehicle identification
number is present on the vehicle; or when the vehicle identification number is
absent from the body or frame, or both, of the vehicle. The state vehicle
identification number shall be assigned by the director of finance of the
county in which the vehicle resides; provided that not more than one hundred
vehicle identification numbers shall be issued annually.

To obtain a state vehicle identification number
under this subsection, the owner of a street rod vehicle that was manufactured
after 1967 to resemble a vehicle manufactured before 1968 shall provide:

(1) A title of ownership from the previous owner of
the vehicle's body or frame;

(2) A bill of sale or invoices for all major parts
used in the modification of the vehicle; and

(3) A weight certificate issued by a state-certified
scale for the actual weight of the vehicle.

(d) Notwithstanding any other law to the
contrary:

(1) Street rod vehicles and street rod replica
vehicles shall be equipped with the following equipment:

(A) Hydraulic service brakes on all wheels;

(B) Sealed beam or halogen headlights;

(C) Turn signals and a turn signaling switch;

(D) Safety glass or lexan windshield;

(E) Electric or vacuum windshield wiper
located in front of the driver;

(F) Standard or DOT/SAE-approved tail lights;

(G) A parking brake that operates on at least
two wheels on the same axle; and

(H) Seat belt assembly as provided in
section 291-11.6;

(2) Street rod vehicles and street rod replica
vehicles shall be equipped in such a manner that no part of a vehicle, other
than the vehicle's tires, will make contact with the surface of a flat highway
when the vehicle is operated on the same;

(3) Bumpers, hoods, door handles, and fenders shall
be optional equipment on street rod vehicles and street rod replica vehicles;
and

(4) Bumpers, hoods, door handles, and fenders shall
be optional equipment on vehicles manufactured before 1968, and on vehicles
manufactured after 1967 to resemble a vehicle manufactured before 1968.

In the event of a conflict between this
subsection and equipment requirements specified in chapters 286, 291 and 291C,
this subsection shall control.

(e) If a street rod replica vehicle was
assembled from a manufactured kit as a complete kit to construct a new vehicle
consisting of a prefabricated body and chassis, the year of the vehicle shall
be the year the vehicle resembles as reflected on the manufacturer's
certificate of origin. If a street rod replica vehicle was assembled from a
manufactured kit as components manufactured before 1968 or components
manufactured after 1967 to resemble a vehicle manufactured before 1968, the
year of the vehicle shall be the year the vehicle resembles as reflected on the
manufacturer's certificate of origin. The certificate of title for a street
rod replica vehicle shall be for the make and year the vehicle resembles, and
the body type of the vehicle shall be street rod vehicle replica (STRD-RPLC).

(f) The state vehicle identification number of
a street rod replica vehicle that was assembled from a manufactured kit as a
complete kit to construct a new vehicle consisting of a prefabricated body and
chassis shall be taken from the manufacturer's certificate of origin. The
state vehicle identification number shall be assigned by the director of
finance of the county in which the vehicle resides; provided that not more than
one hundred vehicle identification numbers shall be issued annually.

The state vehicle identification number of a
street rod replica vehicle that was assembled from a manufactured kit as
components manufactured before 1968 or components manufactured after 1967 to
resemble a vehicle manufactured before 1968, shall be taken from the
manufacturer's certificate of origin or provided by the director of finance of
the county in which the vehicle resides.

To obtain a state vehicle identification number
under this subsection, the owner of a street rod replica vehicle shall provide:

(1) Ownership documents from the manufacturer of the
kit or components;

(2) All shipping and freight documents for the kit or
components; and

(3) A weight certificate issued by a state-certified
scale for the actual weight of the vehicle.

(g) A state vehicle identification number
shall be issued to a street rod replica vehicle when the vehicle identification
number is absent from the body or frame, or both, of the vehicle; or when the
vehicle identification number is absent from the manufacturer's certificate of
origin. The state vehicle identification number shall be assigned by the
director of finance of the county in which the vehicle resides; provided that
not more than one hundred vehicle identification numbers shall be issued
annually. [L 1997, c 246, §2; am L 2004, c 126, §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next